Ohio, session 136, HB358.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 2923.251 of the Revised Code be 4
enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 2923.251. (A) The department of children and youth, 6
in conjunction with the department of public safety, shall 7
develop and provide an informational notice in English, Spanish, 8
and Arabic that contains information and best practices 9
regarding the storage of firearms. This notice shall include the 10
following: 11
(1) Answers to frequently asked questions about firearm 12
storage requirements; 13
(2) Guidance on where a parent or legal guardian can 14
obtain gun locks and gun safes, including free or low-cost 15
options. 16
(B) The department of children and youth shall share the 17

H. B. No. 358 Page 2
As Introduced
informational notice developed under division (A) of this 18
section with every school district and every community school 19
established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, STEM school 20
established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, and 21
chartered or nonchartered nonpublic school. 22
(C) The department of public safety, in conjunction with 23
the department of children and youth, shall update annually the 24
informational notice developed under division (A) of this 25
section to account for any change in the law. The updated notice 26
shall be provided annually. Upon receipt, each school district 27
board of education and each governing body of a community school 28
established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, STEM school 29
established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, or 30
chartered or nonchartered nonpublic school shall distribute the 31
informational notice to the parent or legal guardian of each 32
student enrolled in the district or school. The informational 33
notice may be distributed electronically or by mail and shall 34
also be made available online. 35
(D)(1) The department of children and youth and the 36
department of public safety shall post the English, Spanish, and 37
Arabic versions of the informational notice developed under this 38
section on each department's respective web site. 39
(2) Every school district board of education and every 40
governing body of a community school established under Chapter 41
3314. of the Revised Code, STEM school established under Chapter 42
3326. of the Revised Code, or chartered or nonchartered 43
nonpublic school shall post links to the web sites described in 44
division (D)(1) of this section on the web site of the district 45
or school. 46
(E) The department of public safety, the department of 47

H. B. No. 358 Page 3
As Introduced
children and youth, each school district, and each community 48
school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, STEM 49
school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, and 50
chartered or nonchartered nonpublic school and any officers, 51
board members, or employees of those institutions are immune 52
from civil liability for any damages allegedly caused by, 53
arising out of, or relating to the informational notice 54
developed under division (A) of this section. 55